Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-129
Bond; premium paid by state; manner of paying.

Upon the execution of such bond it shall be the duty of the Director of Administrative Services to draw a warrant for the payment of such premium, countersigned by the State Treasurer and paid out of the appropriation made therefor.

Laws 1905, c. 209, § 3, p. 703;

R.S.1913, § 5734;

C.S.1922, § 5063;

C.S.1929, § 12-127;

R.S.1943, § 11-129;

Laws 1969, c. 53, § 1, p. 353.